Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 7 Tennessee Uniform Transfers to Minors Act
35-7-123. Effect on existing custodianships.

Any transfer of custodial property as now defined in this chapter, including transfers of real property, made before October 1, 1992, is validated, notwithstanding that there was no specific authority in the Tennessee Uniform Gifts to Minors Act for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

This chapter applies to all transfers made before October 1, 1992, in a manner and form prescribed in the Tennessee Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights or extends the duration of custodianships beyond eighteen (18) years of age of the minor which were in existence on October 1, 1992.

Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1; T.C.A. § 35-7-223.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 35-7-101 — 35-7-110 (Acts 1957, ch. 112, §§ 1-10; 1961, ch. 232, § 1; 1963, ch. 65, §§ 1-9; 1968, ch. 600, §§ 1-10; 1972, ch. 612, § 6; 1973, ch. 190, § 1; 1975, ch. 294, § 1; 1976, ch. 393, § 1; 1983, ch. 336, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 35-801 — 35-810), concerning the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1 effective October 1, 1992. See present § 35-7-125. For present law see this chapter.

35-7-124. Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1; T.C.A. § 35-7-224.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 35-7-101 — 35-7-110 (Acts 1957, ch. 112, §§ 1-10; 1961, ch. 232, § 1; 1963, ch. 65, §§ 1-9; 1968, ch. 600, §§ 1-10; 1972, ch. 612, § 6; 1973, ch. 190, § 1; 1975, ch. 294, § 1; 1976, ch. 393, § 1; 1983, ch. 336, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 35-801 — 35-810), concerning the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1 effective October 1, 1992. See present § 35-7-125. For present law see this chapter.

35-7-125. Repeals prior act.

The Tennessee Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, formerly compiled in this chapter, is repealed. To the extent that this chapter, by virtue of § 35-7-123, does not apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed in the Tennessee Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or to the powers, duties and immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of the Tennessee Uniform Gifts to Minors Act does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties and immunities.

Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1; T.C.A. § 35-7-225.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 35-7-101 — 35-7-110 (Acts 1957, ch. 112, §§ 1-10; 1961, ch. 232, § 1; 1963, ch. 65, §§ 1-9; 1968, ch. 600, §§ 1-10; 1972, ch. 612, § 6; 1973, ch. 190, § 1; 1975, ch. 294, § 1; 1976, ch. 393, § 1; 1983, ch. 336, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 35-801 — 35-810), concerning the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1 effective October 1, 1992. See present § 35-7-125. For present law see this chapter.

35-7-126. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1; T.C.A. § 35-7-226.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 35-7-101 — 35-7-110 (Acts 1957, ch. 112, §§ 1-10; 1961, ch. 232, § 1; 1963, ch. 65, §§ 1-9; 1968, ch. 600, §§ 1-10; 1972, ch. 612, § 6; 1973, ch. 190, § 1; 1975, ch. 294, § 1; 1976, ch. 393, § 1; 1983, ch. 336, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 35-801 — 35-810), concerning the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 1 effective October 1, 1992. See present § 35-7-125. For present law see this chapter.